Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
PROCEDURE FOR EXERCISE
OF APPRAISAL RIGHTS

7-113-201. Notice of appraisal rights.

Where any corporate action specified in section 7-113-102 (1) is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting notice must state that the corporation has concluded that the shareholders are, are not, or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article 113. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this article 113 must accompany the meeting notice sent to those shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

In a merger pursuant to section 7-111-104, the parent corporation shall notify in writing all shareholders of the subsidiary that are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. The notice shall be sent within ten days after the corporate action became effective and must include the materials described in section 7-113-203.

Where any corporate action specified in section 7-113-102 (1) is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to section 7-107-104:

Notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available shall be given to each shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of the shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this article 113; and

Notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available shall be delivered, together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by section 7-107-104 (5.5); may include the materials described in section 7-113-203; and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this article 113.

Where corporate action described in section 7-113-102 (1) is proposed or a merger pursuant to section 7-111-104 is effected, the notice required by subsection (1) or (3) of this section, if the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available and by subsection (2) of this section, must be accompanied by:

The annual financial statements specified in section 7-116-105 of the corporation that issued the shares that may be subject to appraisal, which statements must be as of a date ending not more than sixteen months before the date of the notice and must comply with section 7-116-105; except that, if the annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information; and

The latest available quarterly financial statements of the corporation, if any.

The right to receive the information described in subsection (4) of this section may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1953, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 170, § 25, effective April 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-201 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-113-202. Notice of intent to demand payment.

If a proposed corporate action specified in section 7-113-102 (1) is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder that wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

Must deliver to the corporation, before the vote is taken, notice of the shareholder's intent to demand payment if the proposed corporate action is effectuated; and

Must not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of the class or series in favor of the proposed corporate action.

If a proposed corporate action specified in section 7-113-102 (1) is to be approved by less than unanimous written consent, a shareholder that wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares must not execute a consent in favor of the proposed corporate action with respect to that class or series of shares.

A shareholder that fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section is not entitled to demand payment under this article 113.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1954, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 171, § 26, effective April 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-202 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-113-203. Appraisal notice and form.

If a proposed corporate action requiring appraisal rights under section 7-113-102 (1) becomes effective, the corporation shall deliver a written appraisal notice and form to all shareholders that may be entitled to assert appraisal rights.

The appraisal notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent no earlier than the date the corporate action specified in section 7-113-102 (1) became effective, and no later than ten days after that date, and must:

Include a form that:

Specifies the first date of any announcement to shareholders, made before the date the corporate action became effective, of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action;

If the announcement was made, requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before that date; and

Requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify that the shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction;

State:

Where the form must be sent, where certificates for certificated shares must be deposited, and the date by which those certificates must be deposited, which date must not be earlier than the date for receiving the required form under subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section;

A date by which the corporation must receive the form, which date must not be fewer than forty nor more than sixty days after the date the appraisal notice and form are required to be sent pursuant to the introductory portion to subsection (2) of this section, and state that the shareholder waives the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by the specified date;

The corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares;

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide to the shareholder so requesting, within ten days after the date specified in subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section, a statement of the number of shareholders that return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

The date by which the notice to withdraw under section 7-113-204 must be received, which date must be within twenty days after the date specified in subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this article 113.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1954, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-203 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-113-204. Perfection of rights - right to withdraw.

A shareholder that receives notice pursuant to section 7-113-203 and that wishes to exercise appraisal rights must sign and return the form sent by the corporation and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit the shareholder's certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the notice given pursuant to section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(II). In addition, if applicable, the shareholder must certify on the form whether the beneficial owner of the shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to section 7-113-203 (2)(a). If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the corporation may elect to treat the shareholder's shares as after-acquired shares under section 7-113-206. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder's certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed forms, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder unless the shareholder withdraws pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

A shareholder who has complied with subsection (1) of this section may nevertheless decline to exercise appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice given pursuant to section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(V). A shareholder that fails to so withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the corporation's written consent.

A shareholder that does not sign and return the form and, in the case of certified shares, deposit that shareholder's share certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described in section 7-113-203 (2), is not entitled to payment under this article 113.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1955, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-204 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-113-205. Payment.

Except as provided in section 7-113-206, within thirty days after the date specified in section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(II), the corporation shall pay in cash to those shareholders who complied with section 7-113-204 (1) the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of their shares, plus interest.

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be accompanied by:

The annual financial statements specified in section 7-116-105 of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised, which statement must be as of a date ending not more than sixteen months before the date of payment; except that, if the annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information; and

The latest available quarterly financial statements of the corporation, if any;

A statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares, which estimate must equal or exceed the corporation's estimate given pursuant to section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(III); and

A statement that shareholders described in subsection (1) of this section have the right to demand further payment under section 7-113-207 and that if any such shareholder does not do so within the period specified in section 7-113-207 (2), the shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted the payment in full satisfaction of the corporation's obligations under this article 113.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1956, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-206 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-113-206. After-acquired shares.

The corporation may elect to withhold payment otherwise required by section 7-113-205 from any shareholder that was required to certify, but did not certify, that beneficial ownership of all of the shareholder's shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before the date set forth in the appraisal notices sent pursuant to section 7-113-203 (2)(a).

If the corporation elected to withhold payment under subsection (1) of this section, it must, within thirty days after the date specified in section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(II), notify all shareholders that are described in subsection (1) of this section:

Of the information required by section 7-113-205 (2)(a);

Of the corporation's estimate of fair value pursuant to section 7-113-205 (2)(b);

That they may accept the corporation's estimate of fair value, plus interest, in full satisfaction of their demands or demand appraisal under section 7-113-207;

That those shareholders that wish to accept the offer must notify the corporation of their acceptance of the corporation's offer within thirty days after receiving the offer; and

That those shareholders who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under section 7-113-207 shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation's offer.

Within ten days after receiving the shareholder's acceptance pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section, the corporation shall pay in cash the amount it offered under section 7-113-206 (2)(b) to each shareholder that agreed to accept the corporation's offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder's demand.

Within forty days after sending the notice described in subsection (2) of this section, the corporation shall pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under subsection (2)(b) of this section to each shareholder described in subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1956, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-208 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020, and the former § 7-113-206 was relocated to § 7-113-205.

7-113-207. Procedure if shareholder is dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A shareholder that is paid pursuant to section 7-113-205 and is dissatisfied with the amount of the payment must notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder's estimate of the fair value of the shares and demand payment of that estimate, plus interest, less any payment made under section 7-113-205. A shareholder that is offered payment under section 7-113-206 and is dissatisfied with that offer must reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder's stated estimate of the fair value of the shares, plus interest.

A shareholder that fails to notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder's demand to be paid the shareholder's stated estimate of the fair value plus interest under subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after receiving the corporation's payment or offer of payment under section 7-113-205 or 7-113-206, respectively, waives the right to demand payment under this section and is entitled only to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1957, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-209 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.